Illinois, session 104th, HB3863.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-205 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-205)7    Sec. 6-205. Mandatory revocation of license or permit; 8hardship cases. 9    (a) Except as provided in this Section, the Secretary of 10State shall immediately revoke the license, permit, or driving 11privileges of any driver upon receiving a report of the 12driver's conviction of any of the following offenses:13        1. Reckless homicide resulting from the operation of a 14    motor vehicle;15        2. Violation of Section 11-501 of this Code or a 16    similar provision of a local ordinance relating to the 17    offense of operating or being in physical control of a 18    vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, other drug 19    or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or any 20    combination thereof;21        3. Any felony under the laws of any State or the 22    federal government in the commission of which a motor 23    vehicle was used;  HB3863- 2 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1        4. Violation of Section 11-401 of this Code relating 2    to the offense of leaving the scene of a traffic crash 3    involving death or personal injury;4        5. Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or 5    statement under oath to the Secretary of State under this 6    Code or under any other law relating to the ownership or 7    operation of motor vehicles;8        6. Conviction upon 3 charges of violation of Section 9    11-503 of this Code relating to the offense of reckless 10    driving committed within a period of 12 months;11        7. Conviction of any offense defined in Section 4-102 12    of this Code if the person exercised actual physical 13    control over the vehicle during the commission of the 14    offense;15        8. Violation of Section 11-504 of this Code relating 16    to the offense of drag racing;17        9. Violation of Chapters 8 and 9 of this Code;18        10. Violation of Section 12-5 of the Criminal Code of 19    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 arising from the use of a 20    motor vehicle;21        11. Violation of Section 11-204.1 of this Code 22    relating to aggravated fleeing or attempting to elude a 23    peace officer;24        12. Violation of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of 25    Section 6-507, or a similar law of any other state, 26    relating to the unlawful operation of a commercial motor   HB3863- 3 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1    vehicle;2        13. Violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-502 of 3    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance if 4    the driver has been previously convicted of a violation of 5    that Section or a similar provision of a local ordinance 6    and the driver was less than 21 years of age at the time of 7    the offense;8        14. Violation of paragraph (a) of Section 11-506 of 9    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance 10    relating to the offense of street racing; 11        15. A second or subsequent conviction of driving while 12    the person's driver's license, permit or privileges was 13    revoked for reckless homicide or a similar out-of-state 14    offense; 15        16. Any offense against any provision in this Code, or 16    any local ordinance, regulating the movement of traffic 17    when that offense was the proximate cause of the death of 18    any person, unless the circuit court in which the 19    conviction was entered makes a finding that the driver's 20    retention of a license, a permit, or driving privileges 21    does not endanger the public. Any person whose driving 22    privileges have been revoked pursuant to this paragraph 23    may seek to have the revocation terminated or to have the 24    length of revocation reduced by requesting an 25    administrative hearing with the Secretary of State prior 26    to the projected driver's license application eligibility   HB3863- 4 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1    date; 2        17. Violation of subsection (a-2) of Section 11-1301.3 3    of this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance;4        18. A second or subsequent conviction of illegal 5    possession, while operating or in actual physical control, 6    as a driver, of a motor vehicle, of any controlled 7    substance prohibited under the Illinois Controlled 8    Substances Act, any cannabis prohibited under the Cannabis 9    Control Act, or any methamphetamine prohibited under the 10    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act. A 11    defendant found guilty of this offense while operating a 12    motor vehicle shall have an entry made in the court record 13    by the presiding judge that this offense did occur while 14    the defendant was operating a motor vehicle and order the 15    clerk of the court to report the violation to the 16    Secretary of State;17        19. Violation of subsection (a) of Section 11-1414 of 18    this Code, or a similar provision of a local ordinance, 19    relating to the offense of overtaking or passing of a 20    school bus when the driver, in committing the violation, 21    is involved in a motor vehicle crash that results in death 22    to another and the violation is a proximate cause of the 23    death. 24    (b) The Secretary of State shall also immediately revoke 25the license or permit of any driver in the following 26situations:  HB3863- 5 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1        1. Of any minor upon receiving the notice provided for 2    in Section 5-901 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 that the 3    minor has been adjudicated under that Act as having 4    committed an offense relating to motor vehicles prescribed 5    in Section 4-103 of this Code;6        2. Of any person when any other law of this State 7    requires either the revocation or suspension of a license 8    or permit;9        3. Of any person adjudicated under the Juvenile Court 10    Act of 1987 based on an offense determined to have been 11    committed in furtherance of the criminal activities of an 12    organized gang as provided in Section 5-710 of that Act, 13    and that involved the operation or use of a motor vehicle 14    or the use of a driver's license or permit. The revocation 15    shall remain in effect for the period determined by the 16    court.17    (c)(1) Whenever a person is convicted of any of the 18offenses enumerated in this Section, the court may recommend 19and the Secretary of State in his discretion, without regard 20to whether the recommendation is made by the court may, upon 21application, issue to the person a restricted driving permit 22granting the privilege of driving a motor vehicle between the 23petitioner's residence and petitioner's place of employment or 24within the scope of the petitioner's employment related 25duties, or to allow the petitioner to transport himself or 26herself or a family member of the petitioner's household to a   HB3863- 6 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1medical facility for the receipt of necessary medical care or 2to allow the petitioner to transport himself or herself to and 3from alcohol or drug remedial or rehabilitative activity 4recommended by a licensed service provider, or to allow the 5petitioner to transport himself or herself or a family member 6of the petitioner's household to classes, as a student, at an 7accredited educational institution, or to allow the petitioner 8to transport children, elderly persons, or persons with 9disabilities who do not hold driving privileges and are living 10in the petitioner's household to and from daycare; if the 11petitioner is able to demonstrate that no alternative means of 12transportation is reasonably available and that the petitioner 13will not endanger the public safety or welfare; provided that 14the Secretary's discretion shall be limited to cases where 15undue hardship, as defined by the rules of the Secretary of 16State, would result from a failure to issue the restricted 17driving permit.18    (1.5) A person subject to the provisions of paragraph 4 of 19subsection (b) of Section 6-208 of this Code may make 20application for a restricted driving permit at a hearing 21conducted under Section 2-118 of this Code after the 22expiration of 5 years from the effective date of the most 23recent revocation, or after 5 years from the date of release 24from a period of imprisonment resulting from a conviction of 25the most recent offense, whichever is later, provided the 26person, in addition to all other requirements of the   HB3863- 7 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1Secretary, shows by clear and convincing evidence: 2        (A) a minimum of 3 years of uninterrupted abstinence 3    from alcohol and the unlawful use or consumption of 4    cannabis under the Cannabis Control Act, a controlled 5    substance under the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an 6    intoxicating compound under the Use of Intoxicating 7    Compounds Act, or methamphetamine under the 8    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act; and 9        (B) the successful completion of any rehabilitative 10    treatment and involvement in any ongoing rehabilitative 11    activity that may be recommended by a properly licensed 12    service provider according to an assessment of the 13    person's alcohol or drug use under Section 11-501.01 of 14    this Code. 15    In determining whether an applicant is eligible for a 16restricted driving permit under this paragraph (1.5), the 17Secretary may consider any relevant evidence, including, but 18not limited to, testimony, affidavits, records, and the 19results of regular alcohol or drug tests. Persons subject to 20the provisions of paragraph 4 of subsection (b) of Section 216-208 of this Code and who have been convicted of more than one 22violation of paragraph (3), paragraph (4), or paragraph (5) of 23subsection (a) of Section 11-501 of this Code shall not be 24eligible to apply for a restricted driving permit. 25    A restricted driving permit issued under this paragraph 26(1.5) shall provide that the holder may only operate motor   HB3863- 8 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device as 2required under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section 3and subparagraph (A) of paragraph 3 of subsection (c) of 4Section 6-206 of this Code. The Secretary may revoke a 5restricted driving permit or amend the conditions of a 6restricted driving permit issued under this paragraph (1.5) if 7the holder operates a vehicle that is not equipped with an 8ignition interlock device, or for any other reason authorized 9under this Code. 10    A restricted driving permit issued under this paragraph 11(1.5) shall be revoked, and the holder barred from applying 12for or being issued a restricted driving permit in the future, 13if the holder is subsequently convicted of a violation of 14Section 11-501 of this Code, a similar provision of a local 15ordinance, or a similar offense in another state.16    (2) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 17suspended due to 2 or more convictions of violating Section 1811-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance 19or a similar out-of-state offense, or Section 9-3 of the 20Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, where the 21use of alcohol or other drugs is recited as an element of the 22offense, or a similar out-of-state offense, or a combination 23of these offenses, arising out of separate occurrences, that 24person, if issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate 25a vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 26interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.  HB3863- 9 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1    (3) If: 2        (A) a person's license or permit is revoked or 3    suspended 2 or more times due to any combination of:4            (i) a single conviction of violating Section 5        11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 6        ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense, or 7        Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 8        Criminal Code of 2012, where the use of alcohol or 9        other drugs is recited as an element of the offense, or 10        a similar out-of-state offense; or11            (ii) a statutory summary suspension or revocation 12        under Section 11-501.1; or13            (iii) a suspension pursuant to Section 6-203.1; 14    arising out of separate occurrences; or15        (B) a person has been convicted of one violation of 16    subparagraph (C) or (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) 17    of Section 11-501 of this Code, Section 9-3 of the 18    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 19    relating to the offense of reckless homicide where the use 20    of alcohol or other drugs was recited as an element of the 21    offense, or a similar provision of a law of another state; 22that person, if issued a restricted driving permit, may not 23operate a vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 24interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1. 25    (4) The person issued a permit conditioned on the use of an 26ignition interlock device must pay to the Secretary of State   HB3863- 10 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1DUI Administration Fund an amount not to exceed $30 per month. 2The Secretary shall establish by rule the amount and the 3procedures, terms, and conditions relating to these fees. 4    (5) If the restricted driving permit is issued for 5employment purposes, then the prohibition against operating a 6motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock 7device does not apply to the operation of an occupational 8vehicle owned or leased by that person's employer when used 9solely for employment purposes. For any person who, within a 105-year period, is convicted of a second or subsequent offense 11under Section 11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a 12local ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, this 13employment exemption does not apply until either a one-year 14period has elapsed during which that person had his or her 15driving privileges revoked or a one-year period has elapsed 16during which that person had a restricted driving permit which 17required the use of an ignition interlock device on every 18motor vehicle owned or operated by that person. 19    (6) In each case the Secretary of State may issue a 20restricted driving permit for a period he deems appropriate, 21except that the permit shall expire no later than 2 years from 22the date of issuance. A restricted driving permit issued under 23this Section shall be subject to cancellation, revocation, and 24suspension by the Secretary of State in like manner and for 25like cause as a driver's license issued under this Code may be 26cancelled, revoked, or suspended; except that a conviction   HB3863- 11 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1upon one or more offenses against laws or ordinances 2regulating the movement of traffic shall be deemed sufficient 3cause for the revocation, suspension, or cancellation of a 4restricted driving permit. The Secretary of State may, as a 5condition to the issuance of a restricted driving permit, 6require the petitioner to participate in a designated driver 7remedial or rehabilitative program. The Secretary of State is 8authorized to cancel a restricted driving permit if the permit 9holder does not successfully complete the program. However, if 10an individual's driving privileges have been revoked in 11accordance with paragraph 13 of subsection (a) of this 12Section, no restricted driving permit shall be issued until 13the individual has served 6 months of the revocation period.14    (c-5) (Blank). 15    (c-6) If a person is convicted of a second violation of 16operating a motor vehicle while the person's driver's license, 17permit or privilege was revoked, where the revocation was for 18a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 19Criminal Code of 2012 relating to the offense of reckless 20homicide or a similar out-of-state offense, the person's 21driving privileges shall be revoked pursuant to subdivision 22(a)(15) of this Section. The person may not make application 23for a license or permit until the expiration of five years from 24the effective date of the revocation or the expiration of five 25years from the date of release from a term of imprisonment, 26whichever is later.   HB3863- 12 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1    (c-7) If a person is convicted of a third or subsequent 2violation of operating a motor vehicle while the person's 3driver's license, permit or privilege was revoked, where the 4revocation was for a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal 5Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 relating to the 6offense of reckless homicide or a similar out-of-state 7offense, the person may never apply for a license or permit. 8    (d)(1) Whenever a person under the age of 21 is convicted 9under Section 11-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a 10local ordinance or a similar out-of-state offense, the 11Secretary of State shall revoke the driving privileges of that 12person. One year after the date of revocation, and upon 13application, the Secretary of State may, if satisfied that the 14person applying will not endanger the public safety or 15welfare, issue a restricted driving permit granting the 16privilege of driving a motor vehicle only between the hours of 175 a.m. and 9 p.m. or as otherwise provided by this Section for 18a period of one year. After this one-year period, and upon 19reapplication for a license as provided in Section 6-106, upon 20payment of the appropriate reinstatement fee provided under 21paragraph (b) of Section 6-118, the Secretary of State, in his 22discretion, may reinstate the petitioner's driver's license 23and driving privileges, or extend the restricted driving 24permit as many times as the Secretary of State deems 25appropriate, by additional periods of not more than 24 months 26each.  HB3863- 13 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1    (2) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 2suspended due to 2 or more convictions of violating Section 311-501 of this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance 4or a similar out-of-state offense, or Section 9-3 of the 5Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, where the 6use of alcohol or other drugs is recited as an element of the 7offense, or a similar out-of-state offense, or a combination 8of these offenses, arising out of separate occurrences, that 9person, if issued a restricted driving permit, may not operate 10a vehicle unless it has been equipped with an ignition 11interlock device as defined in Section 1-129.1.12    (3) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 13suspended 2 or more times due to any combination of:14        (A) a single conviction of violating Section 11-501 of 15    this Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance or a 16    similar out-of-state offense, or Section 9-3 of the 17    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, where 18    the use of alcohol or other drugs is recited as an element 19    of the offense, or a similar out-of-state offense; or20        (B) a statutory summary suspension or revocation under 21    Section 11-501.1; or 22        (C) a suspension pursuant to Section 6-203.1;23arising out of separate occurrences, that person, if issued a 24restricted driving permit, may not operate a vehicle unless it 25has been equipped with an ignition interlock device as defined 26in Section 1-129.1.  HB3863- 14 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1    (3.5) If a person's license or permit is revoked or 2suspended due to a conviction for a violation of subparagraph 3(C) or (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 11-501 4of this Code, or a similar provision of a local ordinance or 5similar out-of-state offense, that person, if issued a 6restricted driving permit, may not operate a vehicle unless it 7has been equipped with an ignition interlock device as defined 8in Section 1-129.1. 9    (4) The person issued a permit conditioned upon the use of 10an interlock device must pay to the Secretary of State DUI 11Administration Fund an amount not to exceed $30 per month. The 12Secretary shall establish by rule the amount and the 13procedures, terms, and conditions relating to these fees.14    (5) If the restricted driving permit is issued for 15employment purposes, then the prohibition against driving a 16vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device 17does not apply to the operation of an occupational vehicle 18owned or leased by that person's employer when used solely for 19employment purposes. For any person who, within a 5-year 20period, is convicted of a second or subsequent offense under 21Section 11-501 of this Code, or a similar provision of a local 22ordinance or similar out-of-state offense, this employment 23exemption does not apply until either a one-year period has 24elapsed during which that person had his or her driving 25privileges revoked or a one-year period has elapsed during 26which that person had a restricted driving permit which   HB3863- 15 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1required the use of an ignition interlock device on every 2motor vehicle owned or operated by that person.3    (6) A restricted driving permit issued under this Section 4shall be subject to cancellation, revocation, and suspension 5by the Secretary of State in like manner and for like cause as 6a driver's license issued under this Code may be cancelled, 7revoked, or suspended; except that a conviction upon one or 8more offenses against laws or ordinances regulating the 9movement of traffic shall be deemed sufficient cause for the 10revocation, suspension, or cancellation of a restricted 11driving permit. 12    (d-5) The revocation of the license, permit, or driving 13privileges of a person convicted of a third or subsequent 14violation of Section 6-303 of this Code committed while his or 15her driver's license, permit, or privilege was revoked because 16of a violation of Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 17the Criminal Code of 2012, relating to the offense of reckless 18homicide, or a similar provision of a law of another state, is 19permanent. The Secretary may not, at any time, issue a license 20or permit to that person. 21    (e) This Section is subject to the provisions of the 22Driver License Compact.23    (f) Any revocation imposed upon any person under 24subsections 2 and 3 of paragraph (b) that is in effect on 25December 31, 1988 shall be converted to a suspension for a like 26period of time.  HB3863- 16 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1    (g) The Secretary of State shall not issue a restricted 2driving permit to a person under the age of 16 years whose 3driving privileges have been revoked under any provisions of 4this Code.5    (h) The Secretary of State shall require the use of 6ignition interlock devices for a period not less than 5 years 7on all vehicles owned by a person who has been convicted of a 8second or subsequent offense under Section 11-501 of this Code 9or a similar provision of a local ordinance. The person must 10pay to the Secretary of State DUI Administration Fund an 11amount not to exceed $30 for each month that he or she uses the 12device. The Secretary shall establish by rule and regulation 13the procedures for certification and use of the interlock 14system, the amount of the fee, and the procedures, terms, and 15conditions relating to these fees. During the time period in 16which a person is required to install an ignition interlock 17device under this subsection (h), that person shall only 18operate vehicles in which ignition interlock devices have been 19installed, except as allowed by subdivision (c)(5) or (d)(5) 20of this Section. Regardless of whether an exemption under 21subdivision (c) (5) or (d) (5) applies, every person subject 22to this subsection shall not be eligible for reinstatement 23until the person installs an ignition interlock device and 24maintains the ignition interlock device for 5 years. 25    (i) (Blank).26    (j) In accordance with 49 C.F.R. 384, the Secretary of   HB3863- 17 -LRB104 12336 LNS 22514 b1State may not issue a restricted driving permit for the 2operation of a commercial motor vehicle to a person holding a 3CDL whose driving privileges have been revoked, suspended, 4cancelled, or disqualified under any provisions of this Code. 5    (k) The Secretary of State shall notify by mail any person 6whose driving privileges have been revoked under paragraph 16 7of subsection (a) of this Section that his or her driving 8privileges and driver's license will be revoked 90 days from 9the date of the mailing of the notice.10(Source: P.A. 101-623, eff. 7-1-20; 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 11102-982, eff. 7-1-23.)